Washington statutes.
RCW 15.24.140

Right to inspect.

The commission may inspect the premises and records of any carrier, handler, dealer, or processor for the purpose of enforcing this chapter and the collection of the excise tax.

[ 1961 c 11 s 15.24.140. Prior: 1937 c 195 s 19; RRS s 2874-19.]